New Jersey, session 222, S3165.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, reimbursement under NJ FamilyCare, whether under the fee-for service  or managed care delivery system, for long-acting injectable antipsychotic drugs administered in an inpatient setting shall be : (1)   separate and distinct from any reimbursement issued to an inpatient provider based on a Diagnostic Related Group reimbursement system; and (2)   at a rate equal to the NJ FamilyCare reimbursement rate of the identical long-acting injectable antipsychotic drug when administered in an outpatient setting. b.    The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter any coverage requirements for long-acting injectable antipsychotic drugs under NJ FamilyCare, when administered in an inpatient setting. c.     As used in this section: Diagnostic Related Group reimbursement system means an inpatient provider payment system that classifies patients into groups based on the patients principal procedure, diagnosis, or other significant characteristics to determine the providers reimbursement payment. Long-acting injectable antipsychotic drugs mean medications approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that can treat and manage symptoms of major psychiatric disorders, such as schizophrenia and bipolar disorder, for up to 24 weeks with a single dose. NJ FamilyCare means the program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.), which includes the Medicaid program and the Childrens Health Insurance Program. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.